Louisiana, session 2026, HB508.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:116.7 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§116.7. Special provisions applicable to outlaw quadrupeds
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, owners of private
property shall not be required to obtain a hunting license to take outlaw quadrupeds
within the bounds of their own private property.